Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-104
Existing rules, regulations, licenses, certificates, and legal and administrative proceedings; how treated.

(1) All rules and regulations adopted prior to December 1, 2008, under the Uniform Licensing Law or other statutes amended or repealed by Laws 2007, LB 463, shall continue to be effective under the Uniform Credentialing Act to the extent not in conflict with the act.

(2) All licenses, certificates, registrations, permits, seals, practice agreements, or other forms of approval issued prior to December 1, 2008, in accordance with the Uniform Licensing Law or other statutes amended or repealed by Laws 2007, LB 463, shall remain valid as issued for purposes of the Uniform Credentialing Act unless revoked or otherwise terminated by law.

(3) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, which was lawfully commenced prior to December 1, 2008, under the Uniform Licensing Law or other statutes amended or repealed by Laws 2007, LB 463, shall be subject to the provisions of the Uniform Licensing Law or such other statutes as they existed prior to December 1, 2008.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 4.